Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 33 COLORADO SURFACE COAL MINING RECLAMATION ACT
34-33-111. Reclamation plan requirements.

Each reclamation plan submitted as part of a permit application pursuant to this article shall include, in the degree of detail necessary to demonstrate that reclamation required by this article can be accomplished, a statement of:

The identification of the lands subject to surface coal mining operations over the estimated life of those operations and the size, sequence, and timing of the subareas for which it is anticipated that individual permits will be sought;

The condition of the land to be covered by the permit prior to any surface coal mining operations, including:

The uses existing at the time of the application and, if the land has a history of previous mining, the uses which preceded any mining;

The capability of the land prior to any mining to support a variety of uses, giving consideration to soil and foundation characteristics, topography, and vegetative cover and, if applicable, a soil survey prepared pursuant to section 34-33-110 (2)(q); and

The productivity of the land prior to mining, including appropriate classification as prime farmlands, as well as the average yield of food, fiber, forage, or wood products from such lands obtained under high levels of management;

The use which is proposed to be made of the land following reclamation, including a discussion of the utility and capacity of the reclaimed land to support a variety of alternative uses and the relationship of such use to existing land use policies and plans, and the comments of any owner of the surface and the federal, state, and local governments or agencies thereof which would have to initiate, implement, approve, or authorize the proposed use of the land following reclamation;

A detailed description of how the proposed postmining land use is to be achieved and the necessary support activities which may be needed to achieve the proposed land use;

The engineering techniques proposed to be used in the surface coal mining and reclamation operations and a description of the major equipment to be used; a plan for the control of surface water drainage and of water accumulation; a plan, where appropriate, for backfilling, soil stabilization, and compacting, grading, and appropriate revegetation; a plan for soil reconstruction, replacement, and stabilization, pursuant to the performance standards in section 34-33-120 (2)(g), for those food, forage, and forest lands subject to the provisions of section 34-33-120 (2)(g); an estimate of the cost per acre of the reclamation, including a statement as to how the applicant plans to comply with each of the requirements set out in section 34-33-120;

The consideration which has been given to maximize the utilization and conservation of the solid fuel resource being recovered so that reaffecting the land in the future can be minimized;

A detailed estimated timetable for the accomplishment of each major step in the reclamation plan;

The consideration which has been given to making the surface coal mining and reclamation operations consistent with surface-owner plans and with applicable state and local land use plans and programs;

The steps to be taken to comply with applicable air and water quality laws and regulations and any applicable health and safety standards as administered by applicable state and federal agencies;

The consideration which has been given to developing the reclamation plan in a manner consistent with local physical, environmental, and climatological conditions;

All lands, interests in lands, or options on such interests held by the applicant or pending bids on interests in lands by the applicant, which lands are contiguous to the area to be covered by the permit;

The results of test boring made at the area or other equivalent information and data in a form satisfactory to the office, including the location of subsurface water, and an analysis of the chemical properties, including acid-forming properties, of the mineral and overburden; except that information which pertains to the quantity of the coal or to the analysis of the chemical and physical properties of the coal (excepting that information which the office reasonably believes to concern a mineral or elemental content which is potentially toxic in the environment) shall be kept confidential and shall not be made a matter of public record;

A detailed description of the measures to be taken during the surface coal mining and reclamation operations to assure the protection of:

The quality of surface water and groundwater systems, both on-site and off-site, from adverse effects of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations;

The rights of present users to such water; and

The quantity of water in surface and groundwater systems. Protection measures may include providing water by exchange, substitution, replacement, or augmentation, as appropriate under state law.

Any information required by this section which is not on public file pursuant to state law shall be held in confidence by the board and the office.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1264, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(l) and (2) amended, p. 1949, § 54, effective July 1.

34-33-112. Small operator assistance.

If the office finds that the probable total annual production at all locations of any operator or parent company will not exceed one hundred thousand tons, upon written request of the operator, the office shall, to the extent that funding or services are appropriated or otherwise provided for the express purposes of this section:

Have performed by a qualified public or private laboratory designated by the board the determination of probable hydrologic consequences required by section 34-33-110 (2)(l) and the statement of test borings or core samplings required by section 34-33-110 (2)(p);

Provide additional necessary technical and administrative assistance to the operator in the preparation of permit applications and revisions under this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1949, § 55, effective July 1.

34-33-113. Performance bonds.

After a permit application has been approved but before a permit is issued, the applicant shall file with the division, on a form prescribed and furnished by the board, a performance bond, payable to this state and conditioned upon faithful performance of all the requirements of this article and the permit. The bond shall cover the area of land within the permit area upon which the applicant will initiate and conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations within the initial term of the permit. As succeeding increments of surface coal mining and reclamation operations are initiated and conducted within the permit area, the permittee shall file with the board an additional bond or bonds to cover such increments in accordance with this section. The amount of the bond required for each bonded area shall depend upon the reclamation requirements of the approved permit, shall reflect the probable difficulty of reclamation, giving consideration to such factors as topography, geology of the site, hydrology, and revegetation potential, and shall be determined as part of the proposed decision of the office pursuant to section 34-33-114, and subject to review by the board as provided in section 34-33-119. The amount of the bond shall be sufficient to assure the completion of the reclamation plan if the work had to be performed by the board in the event of forfeiture, and in no case shall the bond for the entire area under one permit be less than ten thousand dollars.

Liability under the bond shall be for the duration of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations and for a period coincident with the operator's responsibility for revegetation requirements in section 34-33-120. The bond shall be executed by the applicant and a corporate surety licensed to do business in this state; except that the applicant may elect to deposit cash, negotiable bonds of the United States government or any political subdivision of this state, or negotiable certificates of deposit of any bank or other savings institution organized or transacting business in the United States. The cash deposit or market value of such securities shall be equal to or greater than the amount of the bond required for the bonded area. Cash or securities so deposited shall be deposited on the same terms upon which surety bonds may be deposited.

The office may accept the bond of the applicant itself without separate surety when the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the office that the applicant has the financial means sufficient to self-bond for reclamation, pursuant to reasonable bonding regulations promulgated by the board, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this article.

Cash or securities posted as bond shall be deposited by the state treasurer in separate escrow accounts, to be known as reclamation surety accounts, and interest accruing on said funds shall be paid to the operator annually.

The amount of the bond or deposit required and the terms of each acceptance of the applicant's bond shall be adjusted by the office from time to time for good cause as affected land acreages are increased or decreased or when the cost of future reclamation changes.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1266, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1), (3), and (5) amended, p. 1950, § 56, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 172, § 1, effective March 28.

34-33-114. Permit approval or denial.

Upon the basis of a complete permit application, including a reclamation plan, or revision or renewal thereof, as required by this article, including public notification and opportunity for public hearing as required by sections 34-33-118 and 34-33-119, the office shall process the permit application and issue a proposed decision granting or denying the permit, in whole or in part, or requiring modifications to the permit application within the time periods provided for in sections 34-33-118 and 34-33-119, and the office shall notify the applicant in writing of the proposed decision. The applicant for a permit or for a revision of a permit shall have the burden of establishing that such application is in compliance with all the requirements of this article. Within ten days after issuing its proposed decision granting or denying a permit, the office shall file a notice with the board of county commissioners of the county in which the area of land to be affected is located stating the proposed decision issued and describing the location of the affected land.

No application for a permit or for a revision of an existing permit shall be approved unless the application affirmatively demonstrates and the office or board finds in writing, on the basis of the information set forth in the application or from information otherwise available which will be documented in the decision and made available to the applicant, that:

The permit application is accurate and contains all information required under this article and regulations promulgated thereunder and that all the requirements of this article have been complied with;

The applicant has demonstrated that reclamation as required by this article can be accomplished under the reclamation plan contained in the permit application;

The assessment of the probable cumulative impact of all anticipated mining in the area on the hydrologic balance specified in section 34-33-110 (2)(l) has been made by the office and the proposed operation thereof has been designed to prevent material damage to hydrologic balance outside the permit area;

Granting the permit will not conflict with any designation decision issued pursuant to section 34-33-126 or pursuant to section 522 of the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", as amended, Pub.L. 95-87, nor is the area proposed to be mined within an area under study for unsuitability designation in an administrative proceeding commenced pursuant to section 34-33-126 or section 522 of said Pub.L. 95-87;

The proposed surface coal mining operations would:

Not interrupt, discontinue, or preclude farming on alluvial valley floors that are irrigated or naturally subirrigated, excluding undeveloped range lands which are not significant to farming on said alluvial valley floors and those lands upon which the board finds that the farming which will be interrupted, discontinued, or precluded is of such small acreage as to be of negligible impact on said land's agricultural production; or

Not materially damage the quantity or quality of surface water or groundwater systems that supply the alluvial valley floors described in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I).

The requirements of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e) shall not affect those surface coal mining operations which, in the year preceding August 3, 1977, either produced coal in commercial quantities and were located within or adjacent to alluvial valley floors or had obtained permit approval to conduct surface coal mining operations within said alluvial valley floors.

In cases where the applicant proposes to extract coal by surface methods and where the private mineral estate has been severed from the private surface estate, the applicant has submitted to the office:

The written consent of the surface owner to the extraction of coal by surface coal mining; or

A conveyance that expressly grants or reserves the right to extract the coal by surface coal mining, but, if the conveyance does not expressly grant the right to extract coal by surface coal mining, the surface-subsurface legal relationship shall be determined in accordance with state law; except that nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the board to adjudicate property rights disputes;

Subject to valid rights existing as of August 3, 1977, and with the further exception of those surface coal mining operations which were in existence on August 3, 1977, the application:

Does not include any lands within the boundaries of units of the national park system, the national wildlife refuge systems, the national system of trails, the national wilderness preservation system, the wild and scenic rivers system, including study rivers designated under said act, and national recreation areas designated by act of the United States congress;

Does not include any federal lands within the boundaries of any national forest; except that surface coal mining operations may be permitted on such lands if the secretary finds that there are no significant recreational, timber, economic, or other values which may be incompatible with such surface mining operations, and:

Surface operations and impacts are incident to an underground coal mine; or

Where the secretary of the United States department of agriculture determines, with respect to lands in national forests which do not have significant forest cover, that surface mining is in compliance with the "Multiple-Use Sustained-Yield Act of 1960", as amended, the "Federal Coal Leasing Amendments Act of 1975", as amended, the "National Forest Management Act of 1976", as amended, and the provisions of this article;

Will not adversely affect any publicly owned park or place included in the national register of historic sites unless approved jointly by the office and the federal, state, or local agency with jurisdiction over the park or the historic site;

Does not include lands within one hundred feet of the outside right-of-way line of any public road, except where mine access roads or haulage roads join such right-of-way line; except that the office may permit such roads to be relocated or the area affected to lie within one hundred feet of such road if, after public notice and opportunity for public hearing in the locality, a written finding is made that the interests of the public and the landowners affected thereby will be protected; and

Does not include lands within three hundred feet of any occupied dwelling, unless waived by the owner thereof, nor within three hundred feet of any public building or school, church, community, or institutional building or any public park, nor within one hundred feet of a cemetery.

The applicant shall file with his permit application a schedule listing any and all notices of violations of this article and any applicable law of the United States or of this state, or any applicable rule or regulation of any department or agency of the United States, other states, and this state, pertaining to air or water environmental protection received by the applicant in connection with any surface coal mining operations during the three-year period prior to the date of application. The schedule shall also indicate the final resolution of any such notice of violation. When the schedule or other information available to the board or office indicates that any surface coal mining operation owned or controlled by the applicant is currently in violation of this article or such other laws referred to in this subsection (3), the permit shall not be issued until the applicant submits proof that such violation has been corrected or is in the process of being corrected to the satisfaction of the board, department, or agency which has jurisdiction over such violation, and no permit shall be issued to an applicant after a finding by the board, after opportunity for hearing, that the applicant, or the operator specified in the application, controls or has controlled such surface coal mining operations with a demonstrated pattern of willful violations of this article of such nature and duration and with such resulting irreparable damage to the environment as to indicate an intent not to comply with the provisions of this article.

In addition to finding the application in compliance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, if the surface area proposed to be affected by the operation contains prime farmland pursuant to section 34-33-110 (2)(q), the office shall, after consultation with the secretary of the United States department of agriculture, and pursuant to regulations issued by the secretary of the United States department of the interior with the concurrence of the secretary of the United States department of agriculture, grant a permit to mine on prime farmland if the board or office finds in writing that the operator has the technological capability to restore such mined area, within a reasonable time, to equivalent or higher levels of yield as nonmined prime farmland in the surrounding area under equivalent levels of management and that the operator can meet the soil reconstruction standards in section 34-33-120 (2)(g). Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the requirements of this paragraph (a) shall apply to all permits issued on and after August 3, 1977.

Nothing in this subsection (4) shall apply to any permit issued prior to August 3, 1977, or to any revisions or renewals thereof, or to any existing surface coal mining and reclamation operations for which a permit was issued prior to August 3, 1977.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1267, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 1681, § 3, effective June 16.

L. 92:

(1), IP(2), (2)(c), IP(2)(f), (2)(g)(III), (2)(g)(IV), (3), and (4)(a) amended, p. 1950, § 57, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", see 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.; for the "Multiple-Use Sustained-Yield Act of 1960", see 16 U.S.C. § 528 et seq.; for the "Federal Coal Leasing Amendments Act of 1975", see 30 U.S.C. §§ 184, 191, 201, 202, 207, and 208; for the "National Forest Management Act of 1976", see 16 U.S.C. § 1600 et seq.

34-33-115. Revision of permit.

During the term of the permit, the permittee may submit an application for revision of the permit, together with any necessary revisions to the reclamation plan, to the office.

An application for revision of a permit shall not be approved unless the office finds that the reclamation required by this article can be accomplished under any necessary revisions to the reclamation plan. The revisions shall be approved or disapproved within the time periods provided for by sections 34-33-118 and 34-33-119. The board shall, by regulation, establish guidelines for a determination of the scale or extent of a revision request for which all permit application information requirements and procedures, including notice and hearings, shall apply; except that any revisions which propose significant alterations in the reclamation plan shall be subject to notice and hearing requirements.

Any applications for extension of the area covered by the permit, except incidental boundary revisions, must be made by application for a permit revision or another permit.

No transfer, assignment, or sale of rights granted under any permit issued pursuant to this article shall be made without the written approval of the division.

The office shall, within a time limit prescribed in regulations promulgated by the board, review outstanding permits and may, for good cause shown, require reasonable revisions or modifications of the permit provisions during the term of each such permit; except that such revisions or modifications shall be based upon written findings and shall be subject to the notice and hearing requirement established by this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1270, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1952, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(c) amended, p. 148, § 3, effective April 7.

34-33-116. Technical revision of permit - regulations.

During the term of the permit, the permittee may submit an application for a technical revision of the permit to the office.

An application for a technical revision of a permit shall contain:

An identification of the permit by permit number or other appropriate reference which is the subject of the technical revision;

A specific description of the requested change in the terms of the permit; and

Such other information as may be necessary for the office to properly evaluate the technical revision.

Consistent with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the board may promulgate regulations further defining the form and content of applications for technical revisions; except that applications for technical revisions shall not be subject to the full standards and information requirements applicable to new permit applications under this article; and except that the board or office may reasonably request additional information to evaluate the proposed technical revision.

The board shall promulgate regulations providing for the processing of applications for technical revisions, which regulations shall provide for adequate public notice of such applications and an opportunity for an expeditious hearing before the board for any person who may be adversely affected by the proposed technical revision.

Within sixty days after the filing of a complete application for a technical revision, the office shall issue a proposed decision approving or denying the application in whole or in part. A written copy of such decision shall be promptly provided to the permittee and shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the affected surface coal mining operation. Any requests for a hearing regarding the proposed decision of the office must be received in writing by the office within ten days after such publication. If no request for a hearing is received within such ten-day period, the proposed decision of the office shall immediately become final.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1271, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1953, § 59, effective July 1.

34-33-117. Coal exploration permit - regulations.

Coal exploration activities which cause substantial disturbance of the natural land surface shall be conducted in accordance with exploration regulations issued by the board. Such regulations shall include, at a minimum:

A requirement that, prior to conducting any exploration under this section, any person must file with the office notice of intention to explore, including a description of the exploration area and the period of supposed exploration; and

Provisions for reclamation in accordance with the performance standards in section 34-33-120 of all lands disturbed in exploration, including excavations, roads, drill holes, and the removal of necessary facilities and equipment.

Information submitted to the office pursuant to this section as confidential concerning trade secrets or privileged commercial or financial information which relates to the competitive rights of the person or entity intending to explore the described area shall not be available for public examination.

Any person who conducts any coal exploration activities which cause substantial disturbance of the natural land surface in violation of this section or regulations issued pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of section 34-33-123.

No operator shall remove more than two hundred fifty tons of coal pursuant to an exploration permit without the specific written approval of the board or office.

The regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall include any additional requirements and provisions which the board deems necessary; except that such regulations shall have a reasonable relation to the purposes and provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1271, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(a), (2), and (4) amended, p. 1953, § 60, effective July 1.

34-33-118. Public notice and public hearings on complete applications.

Upon submission of an application for permit, or revision or renewal thereof, as provided by this article, the office shall, within ten days of receipt of said application, review the submission and determine if it is complete. If the application is complete, the applicant shall be duly notified and the application shall be considered filed for the purposes of this article. If the application is incomplete, notice to that effect shall be mailed to the applicant within said ten-day period, and the applicant shall be given the opportunity to amend, revise, or otherwise make said application complete. At the time of submission of an application for a permit, or for renewal or revision of an existing permit, pursuant to the provisions of this article, the applicant shall submit to the office the proposed notice of publication of the ownership, precise location, and boundaries of the land to be affected by the proposed surface coal mining operation.

Upon notification to the applicant that the application for a permit or the application for a permit revision or renewal is complete, the applicant shall place the notice of ownership, precise location, and boundaries of land to be affected by the proposed surface coal mining operation in a local newspaper of general circulation in the locality of said operation. This publication shall be published at least once a week for four consecutive weeks.

On or before the time of first publication, the office shall notify appropriate state and federal agencies and various local government bodies, municipalities, regional planning commissions, boards of county commissioners, county planning agencies, sewage and water treatment authorities, and water conservancy and water conservation districts in the locality in which the proposed surface coal mining operations will take place of the operator's application indicating the application number, a legal description of the land covered by the application, and where a copy of the application may be inspected. These local bodies, agencies, or authorities may submit written comments, within thirty days of the last publication of the above notice, with respect to the effect of the proposed operation on the environment which is within their area of responsibility. Such comments shall be immediately transmitted to the applicant by the office and shall be made available to the public at the same locations as the permit application.

Any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected by a decision of the office regarding the proposed surface coal mining operation, or the officer or head of any federal, state, or local government agency or authority, shall have the right to submit written objections to or comments upon the initial or revised application for a permit to the office within thirty days after the last publication of the above notice. Such objections and comments shall immediately be transmitted to the applicant by the office and shall be made available to the public, at the same locations as the permit application.

Within sixty days of the filing of an application for a permit, the office shall review said application and notify the applicant of preliminary findings as to the substantive adequacy or inadequacy of the application.

Within thirty days after the last publication of the notice specified in subsection (2) of this section, any person who files objections or comments pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section may also request an informal conference. If an informal conference is requested, the office shall hold an informal conference in the locality of the proposed surface coal mining operation. Notice of the date, time, and location of such informal conference shall be given to the applicant and published by the office in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the conference at least two weeks prior to the scheduled conference date. The informal conference shall be held within a reasonable time after close of the comment periods specified under subsections (3) and (4) of this section but no later than thirty days after the close of said periods. The office may arrange with the applicant, upon request by any person who has submitted objections, comments, or a request for an informal conference, access to the proposed mining area for the purpose of gathering information relevant to the proceedings. An electronic or stenographic record shall be made of the informal conference, unless waived by all parties thereto. Such record shall be maintained by the office and shall be accessible to the parties until final release of the applicant's performance bond. In the event that all persons requesting the informal conference stipulate agreement prior to the requested informal conference and withdraw their request, such informal conference need not be held.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1272, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1954, § 61, effective July 1.

34-33-119. Permit application decisions of the office - appeals.

If an informal conference has been held pursuant to section 34-33-118 (6), any party thereto may submit additional information or comments to the office for a period of twenty days following the conference. The office shall issue a proposed decision, granting or denying the permit in whole or in part, no earlier than twenty days and no later than sixty days after the informal conference. The office may, for good cause shown, extend the time for the proposed decision up to an additional sixty days if the application is unusually complex or controversial or if significant snow cover prevents adequate on-site inspection.

If there has been no informal conference pursuant to section 34-33-118 (6), the office shall issue a proposed decision, granting or denying the permit in whole or in part, within one hundred twenty days of the filing of the application. The office may, for good cause shown, extend the time for the proposed decision up to an additional sixty days if the application is unusually complex or controversial or if significant snow cover prevents adequate on-site inspection.

The proposed decision of the office under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be in writing, and a copy thereof shall be furnished to the applicant and all persons who have objected to or submitted comments on the application. If the proposed decision is to deny the application in whole or in part, the office shall set forth specific reasons for the proposed decision. If the proposed decision is to grant the application in whole or in part or with modifications or stipulations, the modifications and stipulations and reasons for the decision shall accompany the notice of proposed decision.

The office shall publish notice of the proposed decision in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the surface coal mining operations once a week for two weeks following issuance of the proposed decision. Any person with an interest which may be adversely affected by the proposed decision may request a formal hearing before the board on the proposed decision. Such request must be made within thirty days of first publication of the proposed decision of the division, be in writing, and state with reasonable specificity the reasons for the request and the objections to the proposed decision.

If a formal hearing is requested, the board shall hold such hearing in an appropriate location no later than thirty days after said request and shall notify the applicant and any person requesting said hearing of the date, time, and location of said hearing. The board shall also publish notice of the proposed hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to section 24-4-105, C.R.S., and shall be adjudicatory in nature. No person who presided at a conference under section 34-33-118 (6) shall either preside at the hearing or participate in the decision thereon in any administrative appeal therefrom. The board may render its decision at the close of the hearing and must, in any event, render a decision within thirty days after the hearing. The board shall issue and furnish the applicant and all persons who participated in the hearing with a copy of the written decision, reversing, affirming, or modifying the proposed decision of the office, and stating the reasons therefor. The decision of the board shall be implemented by the office within five days after the written decision of the board.

If no formal hearing is requested pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the office shall issue and implement the proposed decision as final within five days after the close of the thirty-day period provided by subsection (4) of this section for filing a request for a formal hearing.

When a formal hearing is requested pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the board may grant such temporary relief as it deems appropriate pending final determination of the proceedings if:

All parties to the proceedings have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on a request for temporary relief;

The person requesting such relief shows that there is a substantial likelihood that he will prevail on the merits in the final determination of the proceeding; and

Such relief will not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

For the purpose of such hearing, the board may administer oaths, subpoena witnesses or written or printed materials, compel attendance of the witnesses or production of the materials, and take evidence including, but not limited to, site inspections of the land to be affected and other surface coal mining operations carried on by the applicant in the general vicinity of the proposed operation. A verbatim record of each formal hearing required by this section shall be made, and a transcript shall be made available on request to any party or by order of the board.

If any applicant or any person with an interest which is or may be adversely affected who has participated in the administrative proceedings as an objector is aggrieved by the decision of the board or if the office fails to act within the time limits specified in this article, such applicant or person shall have the right to appeal in accordance with section 34-33-128.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1273, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) to (6) and (9) amended, p. 1955, § 62, effective July 1.